North Carolina, session 2025, SB851.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-79.4(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Types. – The Division shall issue the following types of special registration plates:
…
() America's Semiquincentennial. – Issuable to a registered owner of a motor
vehicle in accordance with G.S. 20-81.12. The plate shall bear the phrase
"America 250" and other imagery commemorating the semiquincentennial.
…."
SECTION 2. The Revisor of Statutes is authorized to alphabetize, number, and
renumber the special registration plates listed in G.S. 20-79.4(b) to ensure that all of the special
registration plates are listed in alphabetical order and numbered accordingly.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S851-v-1*